Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 01. Centralized Licensing.

Administrative Code. —

For general occupational licensing functions, see 12 AAC 02.

Sec. 08.01.010.
Applicability of chapter.

This chapter applies to the

Board of Public Accountancy (AS

08.04.010

);

regulation of acupuncturists under AS 08.06;

State Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and Land Surveyors (AS

08.48.011

);

Athletic Commission (AS 05.05 and AS 05.10);

regulation of athletic trainers under AS 08.07;

regulation of audiologists and speech-language pathologists under AS 08.11;

Board of Barbers and Hairdressers (AS

08.13.010

);

regulation of behavior analysts under AS 08.15;

Big Game Commercial Services Board (AS

08.54.591

);

regulation of business licenses under AS 43.70;

Board of Chiropractic Examiners (AS

08.20.010

);

regulation of collection agencies under AS 08.24;

regulation of concert promoters under AS 08.92;

regulation of construction contractors and home inspectors under AS 08.18;

Board of Dental Examiners (AS

08.36.010

);

regulation of dietitians and nutritionists under AS 08.38;

Board of Certified Direct-Entry Midwives (AS

08.65.010

);

regulation of dispensing opticians under AS 08.71;

regulation of electrical and mechanical administrators under AS 08.40;

regulation of agencies that perform euthanasia services under AS

08.02.050

;

regulation of professional geologists under AS

08.02.011

;

regulation of private professional guardians and private professional conservators (AS 08.26);

regulation of hearing aid dealers under AS 08.55;

Board of Marine Pilots (AS

08.62.010

);

Board of Marital and Family Therapy (AS

08.63.010

);

Board of Massage Therapists (AS

08.61.010

);

State Medical Board (AS

08.64.010

);

regulation of morticians under AS 08.42;

regulation of the practice of naturopathy under AS 08.45;

Board of Nursing (AS

08.68.010

);

regulation of nursing home administrators under AS 08.70;

Board of Examiners in Optometry (AS

08.72.010

);

regulation of pawnbrokers (AS

08.76.100

—

08.76.590

);

Board of Pharmacy (AS

08.80.010

);

State Physical Therapy and Occupational Therapy Board (AS

08.84.010

);

Board of Professional Counselors (AS

08.29.010

);

Board of Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners (AS

08.86.010

);

Real Estate Commission (AS

08.88.011

);

Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers (AS

08.87.010

);

Board of Social Work Examiners (AS

08.95.010

);

Board of Veterinary Examiners (AS

08.98.010

).

History.

(am E.O. No. 60, § 3 (1985); § 1 ch 59 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 136 SLA 1967; am § 2 ch 101 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 143 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 151 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 179 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 45 SLA 1973; am § 14 ch 65 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 141 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 142 SLA 1980; am § 42 ch 167 SLA 1980; am §§ 9, 10 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 56 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1987; am § 48 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 1988; am § 12 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 98 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 126 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1989; am § 3 ch 6 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 177 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 129 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 130 SLA 1992; am §§ 1, 37 ch 101 SLA 1994; am §§ 1, 12 ch 91 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 16 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 131 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 75 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 118 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 67 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 134 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 2005; am § 2 ch 40 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 49 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 114 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

The second 1988 amendment, which added a new paragraph referring to the regulation of electrical administrators, was superseded by the enactment of ch. 98, SLA 1988, which reestablished the Board of Electrical Examiners, referred to in former paragraph (12). Consequently, the second 1988 amendment is not set out in the text of the section.

Under § 57, ch. 40, SLA 2008, the repeal of paragraph (16) by § 4, ch. 19, SLA 2008 was disregarded.

Reorganized in 1985, 1988, 1991, 1992, 1994, 1998, 1999, 2002, 2010, and 2014 to categorize and alphabetize the material and to retain that organization. Paragraph (19) was enacted as (37); renumbered in 2002, at which time other paragraphs were also renumbered to maintain alphabetical order.

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision relating to occupational licensing and the COVID-19 pubic health emergency disaster declared on January 15, 2021, see sec. 7, ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For application requirements and licensing, see 12 AAC 12, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added present paragraph (5).

The second 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, added present paragraph (8).

The third 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added present paragraph (26).

Sec. 08.01.020.
Board organization.

Board members are appointed by the governor and serve at the pleasure of the governor.
Unless otherwise provided, the governor may designate the chair of a board, and all other officers shall be elected by the board members. Unless otherwise provided, officers of a board are the chair and the secretary. A board may provide by regulation that three or more unexcused absences from meetings are cause for removal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 1987)

Sec. 08.01.025.
Public members.

A public member of a board may not

be engaged in the occupation that the board regulates;

be associated by legal contract with a member of the occupation that the board regulates except as a consumer of the services provided by a practitioner of the occupation; or

have a direct financial interest in the occupation that the board regulates.

History.

(§ 1 ch 258 SLA 1976)

Sec. 08.01.030.
Quorum.

A majority of the membership of a board constitutes a quorum unless otherwise provided.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1966)

Sec. 08.01.035.
Appointments and terms.

Members of boards subject to this chapter are appointed for staggered terms of four years. Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), a member of a board serves until a successor is appointed. Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), an appointment to fill a vacancy on a board is for the remainder of the unexpired term. A member who has served all or part of two successive terms on a board may not be reappointed to that board unless four years have elapsed since the person has last served on the board.

History.

(§ 3 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 13 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 1996)

Sec. 08.01.040.
Transportation and per diem.

A board member is entitled to transportation expenses and per diem as set out in AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1966)

Sec. 08.01.050.
Administrative duties of department.

The department shall perform the following administrative and budgetary services when appropriate:

collect and record fees;

maintain records and files;

issue and receive application forms;

notify applicants of acceptance or rejection as determined by the board or, for occupations or activities listed in AS

08.01.010

that are regulated directly by the department, as determined by the department under applicable law;

designate dates examinations are to be held and notify applicants;

publish notice of examinations and proceedings;

arrange space for holding examinations and proceedings;

notify applicants of results of examinations;

issue licenses or temporary licenses as authorized by the board or, for occupations or activities listed in AS

08.01.010

that are regulated directly by the department, as authorized by the department under applicable law;

issue duplicate licenses upon submission of a written request by the licensee attesting to loss of or the failure to receive the original and payment by the licensee of a fee established by regulation adopted by the department;

notify licensees of renewal dates at least 30 days before the expiration date of their licenses;

compile and maintain a current register of licensees;

answer routine inquiries;

maintain files relating to individual licensees;

arrange for printing and advertising;

purchase supplies;

employ additional help when needed;

perform other services that may be requested by the board;

provide inspection, enforcement, and investigative services to the boards and for the occupations listed in AS 08.01.010 regarding all licenses issued by or through the department;

retain and safeguard the official seal of a board and prepare, sign, and affix a board seal, as appropriate, for licenses approved by a board;

issue business licenses under AS 43.70.

The form and content of a license, authorized by a board listed in AS

08.01.010

, including any document evidencing renewal of a license, shall be determined by the department after consultation with and consideration of the views of the board concerned.

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

At the request of one of the following boards, the department may contract with public agencies and private professional organizations to provide assistance and treatment to persons licensed by the board who abuse alcohol, other drugs, or other substances:

Board of Social Work Examiners;

Board of Dental Examiners;

Board of Marital and Family Therapy;

State Medical Board;

Board of Nursing;

Board of Examiners in Optometry;

Board of Pharmacy;

State Physical Therapy and Occupational Therapy Board;

Board of Professional Counselors;

Board of Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners; and

Board of Veterinary Examiners.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 39 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 258 SLA 1976; am §§ 1, 2 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 141 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 166 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 56 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 1987; am § 21 ch 87 SLA 1987; am §§ 4, 49 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 45 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 98 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 6 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 101 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 91 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 75 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 118 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 152 SLA 2003; am § 4 ch 19 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes were made in 1986 to reconcile amendments made to (a)(4) and (a)(9) of this section by chapters 56 and 131, SLA 1986. In 2010, former paragraph (d)(12) was renumbered as (d)(3) to retain alphabetical order.

Cross references. —

For construction of the 1996 amendments, see § 15, ch. 33, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For transitional provisions relating to the 1996 amendments, see § 13 and 14, ch. 33, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For transition provisions relating the 1998 amendments to subsection (d) by § 3, ch. 75, SLA 1998, see § 7, ch. 75, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provisions relating to issuance of a temporary license to a person who served in the armed forces, see AS

08.01.064

.

Administrative Code. —

For collection of fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 1.

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For examination review procedures, see 12 AAC 2, art. 3.

For audiologists, see 12 AAC 7.

For application requirements and licensing, see 12 AAC 12, art. 1.

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

For licenses, permits, and examinations, see 12 AAC 42, art. 1.

For surety fund claims, see 12 AAC 64, art. 6.

Sec. 08.01.060.
Application for license.

All applications for examination or licensing to engage in the business or profession covered by this chapter shall be made in writing to the department.

If the applicant is a natural person, the application must require that the applicant submit the applicant’s social security number to the department. Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a license to engage in a profession may not be issued by the department to a natural person unless the social security number has been provided to the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For collection of fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 1.

For application requirements and licensing, see 12 AAC 12, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

Right of person wrongfully refused license upon proper application therefor to do act for which license is required, 30 A.L.R.2d 1006.

Sec. 08.01.062.
Courtesy licenses.

A board established under this title and the department, with respect to an occupation that it regulates under this title, may by regulation establish criteria for issuing a temporary courtesy license to nonresidents who enter the state so that, on a temporary basis, they may practice the occupation regulated by the board or the department.

The regulations adopted under (a) of this section may include limitations relating to the

duration of the license’s validity;

scope of practice allowed under the license; and

other matters considered important by the board or the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

08.02.030

. Renumbered in 1998.

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For examination applications and standards, see 12 AAC 9, art. 1.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 16, art. 2.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

For applications, see 12 AAC 60, art. 1.

For veterinary licensing and examination, see 12 AAC 68, art. 1.

Sec. 08.01.063.
Military courtesy licenses.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, and notwithstanding another provision of law, the department or appropriate board shall issue a temporary courtesy license to an active duty member of the armed forces of the United States or the spouse of an active duty member of the armed forces of the United States if the active duty member or spouse meets the requirements of this section and applies to the department or appropriate board in the manner prescribed by the department or appropriate board. An application must include evidence satisfactory to the department or appropriate board that the applicant

is an active duty member of the armed forces of the United States or is married to and living with a member of the armed forces of the United States who is on active duty and assigned to a duty station in this state under official active duty military orders;

holds a current license or certificate in another state, district, or territory of the United States, or that is recognized by the United States, including a branch of the armed forces of the United States, with requirements that the department or appropriate board determines are substantially equivalent to those established under this title for that occupation;

if required by the department or appropriate board for obtaining a license in the applicant’s profession, has been fingerprinted and has provided the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check; the fingerprints and fees shall be forwarded to the Department of Public Safety to obtain a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

;

has not committed an act in any jurisdiction that would have constituted grounds for the refusal, suspension, or revocation of a license or certificate to practice that occupation under this title at the time the act was committed;

has not been disciplined by a licensing or credentialing entity in another jurisdiction and is not the subject of an unresolved complaint, review procedure, or disciplinary proceeding conducted by a licensing or credentialing entity in another jurisdiction; and

pays any fees required under this title.

The department or appropriate board shall issue a temporary license under this section to a person who meets the requirements under (a) of this section within 30 days after the department or appropriate board receives the person’s completed application for the temporary license.

A temporary courtesy license issued under this section is valid for 180 days and may be extended at the discretion of the department or appropriate board for one additional 180-day period, on application of the holder of the temporary courtesy license.

This section does not apply to the practice of law or the regulation of attorneys under AS 08.08.

The department shall prepare an annual report that describes, for the previous fiscal year, information on temporary courtesy licenses issued under this section, including

expedited application procedures;

progress made toward implementing regulations for the licenses, changes to regulations made to accommodate the needs of military spouses, and any plans for future regulations;

the number and type of the licenses that have been issued; and

the department’s efforts to inform each board authorized to issue a temporary courtesy license under this section and the military community in the state about the licenses.

The department shall submit the report prepared under (e) of this section to the Joint Armed Services Committee on or before the first day of March each year. In addition, the department shall consolidate the two most recent reports and submit a biennial report to the legislature on or before the first day of March during the first regular session of each legislature. The department shall deliver a copy of the biennial report to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature that the report is available.

The department shall annually produce and distribute to each board authorized to issue a temporary courtesy license under this section informational materials for the purpose of improving the board’s knowledge of the licenses, the application process, and best practices in providing applicant support. The department shall encourage the boards to designate a single employee to serve as the point of contact for public information and inquiries related to temporary courtesy licenses for military spouses.

History.

(§ 1 ch 25 SLA 2011; am §§ 1, 2 ch 29 SLA 2021; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, in (a), in the introductory language, substituted “shall” for “may” following “appropriate board”, inserted “an active duty member of the armed forces of the United States or” following “temporary courtesy license to”, inserted “active duty member or” following “United States if the”, inserted “meets the requirements of this section and” following “spouse”; in (a)(1), inserted “an active duty member of the armed forces of the United States or is” near the beginning, in (a)(2), inserted “, or that is recognized by the United States, including a branch of the armed forces of the United States,” following “territory of the United States”, and inserted “substantially” following “board determines are”; rewrote (b), which read, “The department or appropriate board shall expedite the procedure for issuance of a license under (a) of this section.”

The second 2021 amendment, effective December 13, 2021, added (e) — (g).

Sec. 08.01.064.
Military education, training, and service credit; temporary license.

Notwithstanding another provision of law, the department or applicable board shall accept military education, training, and service for some or all of the qualifications otherwise required of an applicant for a license or certificate issued under this chapter if

the department or applicable board determines that the military education, training, and service is substantially equivalent to some or all of the qualifications otherwise required of an applicant for a license or certificate issued under this chapter; and

the applicant provides satisfactory evidence of successful completion of the education, training, or service as a member of the armed forces of the United States, the United States Reserves, the National Guard of any state, the Military Reserves of any state, or the Naval Militia of any state.

If the department issues temporary licenses or certificates as authorized by the department or applicable board under AS

08.01.050(a)(9)

, the department or applicable board shall issue a temporary license or certificate to a person who

applies to the department or applicable board in a manner prescribed by the department or board;

meets the requirements in AS

08.01.063(a)(3)

— (6); and

while in the armed forces of the United States or any state, as described in (a) of this section,

held a current license or certificate in another state, district, or territory of the United States, practiced in the area of the license or certificate, and maintained the license or certificate in active status before and at the time of application for a license or certificate under this subsection; or

was awarded a degree, diploma, or certificate by a branch of the armed forces of the United States or any state, as described in (a) of this section, that met standards for an equivalent license or a certificate of technical training.

The department or applicable board shall expedite the procedure for issuance of a license or certificate under (b) of this section for an applicant who is on active duty.

A license or certificate issued under (b) of this section is valid for 180 days and may be extended at the discretion of the department or applicable board for one additional 180-day period if the holder of the license or certificate applies for an extension on a form approved by the department or applicable board.

The department or applicable board may adopt regulations necessary to implement this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 2013)

Sec. 08.01.065.
Establishment of fees.

Except for business licenses, the department shall adopt regulations that establish the amount and manner of payment of application fees, examination fees, license fees, registration fees, permit fees, investigation fees, and all other fees as appropriate for the occupations covered by this chapter.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 34 SLA 1992.]

Except as provided in (f) — (j) of this section, the department shall establish fee levels under (a) of this section so that the total amount of fees collected for an occupation approximately equals the actual regulatory costs for the occupation. The department shall annually review each fee level to determine whether the regulatory costs of each occupation are approximately equal to fee collections related to that occupation. If the review indicates that an occupation’s fee collections and regulatory costs are not approximately equal, the department shall calculate fee adjustments and adopt regulations under (a) of this section to implement the adjustments. In January of each year, the department shall report on all fee levels and revisions for the previous year under this subsection to the office of management and budget. If a board regulates an occupation covered by this chapter, the department shall consider the board’s recommendations concerning the occupation’s fee levels and regulatory costs before revising fee schedules to comply with this subsection. In this subsection, “regulatory costs” means costs of the department that are attributable to regulation of an occupation plus

all expenses of the board that regulates the occupation if the board regulates only one occupation;

the expenses of a board that are attributable to the occupation if the board regulates more than one occupation.

The license fee for a business license is set by AS

43.70.030(a)

. The department shall adopt regulations that establish the manner of payment of the license fee.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

Notwithstanding (c) of this section, the department shall establish fee levels under (a) of this section so that the total amount of fees collected by the State Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and Land Surveyors approximately equals the total regulatory costs of the department and the board for all occupations regulated by the board. The department shall set the fee levels for the issuance and renewal of a certificate of registration issued under AS

08.48.211

so that the fee levels are the same for all occupations regulated by the board.

Notwithstanding (c) of this section, the department shall establish fee levels under (a) of this section so that the total amount of fees collected by the department for all occupations regulated under AS 08.11 approximately equals the total regulatory costs of the department for all occupations regulated by the department under AS 08.11. The department shall set the fee levels for the issuance and renewal of licenses issued under AS 08.11 so that the fee levels are the same for all occupations regulated by the department under AS 08.11.

Notwithstanding (c) of this section, the department shall establish fee levels under (a) of this section so that the total amount of fees collected by the Board of Barbers and Hairdressers approximately equals the total regulatory costs of the department, the board, and the Department of Environmental Conservation for all occupations regulated by the board. For purposes of this subsection, the regulatory costs of the Department of Environmental Conservation for the occupations regulated by the board include the cost of inspections under AS

08.13.210(b)

, the cost of developing and adopting regulations under AS

44.46.020

for barbershop, hairdressing, hair braiding, manicuring, esthetics, body piercing, ear piercing, tattooing , and permanent cosmetic coloring establishments, and the cost to the Department of Environmental Conservation of enforcing the regulations for body piercing, tattooing, and permanent cosmetic coloring establishments. The department shall set the fee levels for the issuance and renewal of a practitioner’s license issued under AS

08.13.100

so that the license and license renewal fees are the same for all occupations regulated by the Board of Barbers and Hairdressers.

Notwithstanding (c) of this section, the department shall establish fee levels under (a) of this section so that the total amount of fees collected by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for specialty contractors, home inspectors, and associate home inspectors approximately equals the total regulatory costs of the department for those three registration categories. The department shall set the fee levels for the issuance and renewal of a certificate of registration issued under AS 08.18 so that the fee levels are the same for all three of these registration categories and so that the fee level for a home inspector with a joint registration is not different from the fee level for a home inspector who does not have a joint registration. In this subsection, “joint registration” has the meaning given in AS

08.18.171

.

The department shall establish for real estate appraisal management companies registered under AS 08.87 a registry fee in an amount that equals the amount determined by the federal Appraisal Subcommittee established under 12 U.S.C. 3310 as a national registry fee for each real estate appraiser of the appraiser panel of a real estate appraisal management company under 12 U.S.C. 3338 (Title XI, Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989), as amended by 12 U.S.C. 5301 — 5641 (Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act); the department may annually remit fees paid under this subsection to the Appraisal Subcommittee for participation in the national registry for real estate appraisal management companies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 74 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 1987; am § 5 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 45 SLA 1988; am § 14 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am §§ 2, 4 ch 34 SLA 1992; am §§ 1, 2 ch 47 SLA 1998; am §§ 2, 3 ch 42 SLA 2000; am §§ 1, 2 ch 93 SLA 2000; am §§ 2, 3 ch 134 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2018; am §§ 1, 2 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Both § 2, ch. 34, SLA 1992 and § 1, ch. 2, FSSLA 1992 made identical amendments to (c) of this section.
The latter was given effect because it had the earlier effective date.

The 2000 amendments to (c) of this section were harmonized by the revisor.
Subsection (h) was enacted as (g) and relettered in 2000.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (i) of this section in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For limitation on fees set by regulation, see AS

37.10.050(a)

; for accounting for and disposition of fees, see AS

37.05.142

and

37.05.144

.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 amendment to this section, see sec. 8(a), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For collection of fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 1.

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For application requirements and licensing, see 12 AAC 12, art. 1.

For registration, see 12 AAC 22, art. 1.

For renewal and reinstatement, see 12 AAC 22, art. 2.

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

For licensing, registration, and permit requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 1.

For veterinary licensing and examination, see 12 AAC 68, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (h), inserted “hair braiding,” following “hairdressing,” and substituted “the regulations for body piercing, tattooing, and permanent cosmetic coloring” for “those regulations except for the enforcement costs related to ear piercing” in the second sentence, and made related and stylistic changes.

The second 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (c), substituted “provided in (f) — (j)” for “Provided in (f) — (i)” in the first sentence; added (j).

Sec. 08.01.070.
Administrative duties of boards.

Each board shall perform the following duties in addition to those provided in its respective law:

take minutes and records of all proceedings;

hold a minimum of one meeting each year;

hold at least one examination each year;

request, through the department, investigation of violations of its laws and regulations;

prepare and grade board examinations;

set minimum qualifications for applicants for examination and license and may establish a waiver of continuing education requirements for renewal of a license for the period in which a licensee is engaged in active duty military service as described under AS

08.01.100(f)

;

forward a draft of the minutes of proceedings to the department within 20 days after the proceedings;

forward results of board examinations to the department within 20 days after the examination is given;

notify the department of meeting dates and agenda items at least 15 days before meetings and other proceedings are held;

submit before the end of the fiscal year an annual performance report to the department stating the board’s accomplishments, activities, and needs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 2005)

Sec. 08.01.075.
Disciplinary powers of boards.

A board may take the following disciplinary actions, singly or in combination:

permanently revoke a license;

suspend a license for a specified period;

censure or reprimand a licensee;

impose limitations or conditions on the professional practice of a licensee;

require a licensee to submit to peer review;

impose requirements for remedial professional education to correct deficiencies in the education, training, and skill of the licensee;

impose probation requiring a licensee to report regularly to the board on matters related to the grounds for probation;

impose a civil fine not to exceed $5,000.

A board may withdraw probationary status if the deficiencies that required the sanction are remedied.

A board may summarily suspend a licensee from the practice of the profession before a final hearing is held or during an appeal if the board finds that the licensee poses a clear and immediate danger to the public health and safety. A person is entitled to a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) to appeal the summary suspension within seven days after the order of suspension is issued. A person may appeal an adverse decision of the board on an appeal of a summary suspension to a court of competent jurisdiction.

A board may reinstate a suspended or revoked license if, after a hearing, the board finds that the applicant is able to practice the profession with skill and safety.

A board may accept the voluntary surrender of a license. A license may not be returned unless the board determines that the licensee is competent to resume practice and the licensee pays the appropriate renewal fee.

A board shall seek consistency in the application of disciplinary sanctions. A board shall explain a significant departure from prior decisions involving similar facts in the order imposing the sanction.

History.

(§ 7 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 7 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 4, art. 7.

For parenteral sedation, see 12 AAC 28, art. 6.

For advanced nurse practitioner, see 12 AAC 44, art. 4.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 44, art. 7.

For certified nurse aide, see 12 AAC 44, art. 8.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 52, art. 9.

Sec. 08.01.077.
Conviction as grounds for disciplinary action.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the conviction under AS

47.24.010

of a person licensed, certified, or regulated by the department or a board under this title may be considered by the department or board as grounds for disciplinary proceedings or sanctions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 30 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

08.01.088

. Renumbered in 1998.

Sec. 08.01.080.
Department regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including describing

how an examination is to be conducted;

what is contained in application forms;

how a person applies for an examination or license.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1966; am § 9 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For collection of fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 1.

For examination review procedures, see 12 AAC 2, art. 3.

For audiologists, see 12 AAC 7.

For application requirements and licensing, see 12 AAC 12, art. 1.

For registration, see 12 AAC 21, art. 1.

For specialty contractor trades, see 12 AAC 21, art. 2.

For mechanical contractor, see 12 AAC 21, art. 3.

For residential contractor endorsement, see 12 AAC 21, art. 4.

For registration, see 12 AAC 22, art. 1.

For renewal and reinstatement, see 12 AAC 22, art. 2.

For continuing competency requirements, see 12 AAC 22, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in the introductory language deleted “but not limited to” following “including” and made a related change.

Collateral references. —

Right to attack validity of statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to occupational or professional license as affected by applying for, or securing, license, 65 ALR2d 660.

Single or isolated transactions as falling within provisions of commercial or occupational licensing requirements, 93 ALR2d 90.

Validity of statute, ordinance, or regulation requiring fingerprint of those engaging in specified occupations, 41 ALR3d 732.

Sec. 08.01.087.
Investigative and enforcement powers of department.

The department may, upon its own motion, conduct investigations to

determine whether a person has violated a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under it, or a provision of AS 43.70, or a provision of this title or regulation adopted under this title dealing with an occupation or board listed in AS

08.01.010

; or

secure information useful in the administration of this chapter.

If it appears to the commissioner that a person has engaged in or is about to engage in an act or practice in violation of a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under it, or a provision of AS 43.70, or a provision of this title or regulation adopted under this title dealing with an occupation or board listed in AS

08.01.010

, the commissioner may, if the commissioner considers it in the public interest, and after notification of a proposed order or action by telephone or facsimile to all board members, if a board regulates the act or practice involved, unless a majority of the members of the board object within 10 days,

issue an order directing the person to stop the act or practice; however, reasonable notice of and an opportunity for a hearing must first be given to the person, except that the commissioner may issue a temporary order before a hearing is held; a temporary order remains in effect until a final order affirming, modifying, or reversing the temporary order is issued or until 15 days after the person receives the notice and has not requested a hearing by that time; a temporary order becomes final if the person to whom the notice is addressed does not request a hearing within 15 days after receiving the notice; the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) shall conduct the hearing and shall issue a proposed decision within 10 days after the hearing; the commissioner shall issue a final order within five days after the proposed decision is issued;

bring an action in the superior court to enjoin the acts or practices and to enforce compliance with this chapter, a regulation adopted under it, an order issued under it, or with a provision of this title or regulation adopted under this title dealing with business licenses or an occupation or board listed in AS

08.01.010

;

examine or have examined the books and records of a person whose business activities require a business license or licensure by a board listed in AS 08.01.010, or whose occupation is listed in AS 08.01.010; the commissioner may require the person to pay the reasonable costs of the examination; and

issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses, and the production of books, records, and other documents.

Under procedures and standards of operation established by the department by regulation, and with the agreement of the appropriate agency, the department may designate appropriate state or municipal agencies to investigate reports of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property by certified nurse aides.

History.

(§ 3 ch 258 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 56 SLA 1986; am § 4 ch 45 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1998; am § 8 ch. 163 SLA 2004; am § 10 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in the introductory language in (b) deleted “, telegraph,” following “telephone”.

Administrative Code. —

For administering of anesthetic agent, see 12 AAC 28, art. 1.

For parenteral sedation, see 12 AAC 28, art. 6.

Sec. 08.01.088.
[Renumbered as AS 08.01.077.]